Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Water Pollution Abatement Grant Program

§ 49-17-61.
Water pollution abatement loan program established; water pollution abatement bond and loan funds.

There is hereby created for the State of Mississippi a Water Pollution Abatement Loan Program (“program”) from which shall be made loans in aid of construction. Funds shall be available to any political subdivision legally authorized to own, maintain and operate a sewage, industrial waste or other waste collection, transport, treatment and disposal system. No recipient shall receive from state funds any loan in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost of construction of a project, unless said recipient shall become eligible on or after October 1, 1988, as set forth in Section 49-17-85(3).

Such cost of construction includes: preliminary planning to determine the economic and engineering feasibility of treatment works, the engineering, architectural, legal, fiscal and economic investigations and studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other action necessary to the construction of treatment works; and the erection, building, acquisition, alteration, remodeling, improvement or extension of treatment works; and the inspection and supervision of the construction of treatment works.

No loan shall be made for any project under the provisions of Sections 49-17-61 through 49-17-67 unless such project is in conformity with the State Water Pollution Control Plan and has been certified by the Mississippi Commission on Natural Resources as entitled to priority over eligible projects on the basis of financial as well as water pollution control needs.

Loan funds generated by the issuance of bonds, legislative appropriations or otherwise, shall be deposited in an appropriate account or accounts created under the program.

There is hereby established a special fund designated as the Water Pollution Abatement Bond Fund (“bond fund”), which fund shall be maintained as a separate account in the State Treasury. All bonds which shall be issued by the State of Mississippi to generate funds to be used for loans under this section shall be payable as to principal, interest, premiums, if any, and service fees from the funds deposited in the bond fund. The bond fund hereby established shall be identical to and be a continuation of the Water Pollution Abatement Bond Fund authorized and established by the provisions of Chapter 471, General Laws of the State of Mississippi, 1971.

No funds heretofore deposited under any other laws to the credit of a special fund heretofore maintained in the State Treasury, and heretofore designated under such laws as the Water Pollution Abatement Bond Fund, shall be removed or transferred from such Water Pollution Abatement Bond Fund so maintained and designated under any other laws, except as shall be specifically authorized by law. When such removal or transfer shall be authorized, funds removed or transferred shall be deposited to the credit of a special fund hereby established and designated as the Water Pollution Abatement Loan Fund (“loan fund”), which fund shall be maintained as a separate account in the State Treasury.

Funds on deposit in the loan fund (a) may be used to make loans in aid of construction for water pollution abatement upon appropriation by the Legislature; (b) in the discretion of the commission, may be transferred to the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund for the purpose of matching federal capitalization grants and for allowable uses; and (c) may be used for administration of the State Revolving Loan Program subject to legislative appropriation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-143; Laws, 1971, ch. 456, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch 528, § 19; Laws, 1983, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 534, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 18, 1988).

§ 49-17-63.
Loans in aid; eligibility.

Loans in aid of construction in amounts of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) or less made from state funds shall be made to the political subdivision eligible to receive such loan immediately upon approval of the award by the appropriate federal agency or agencies of a contract, or contracts, for construction.

The remainder of any such loan in aid of construction from state funds shall be made in installments in accord with rules and regulations adopted by the bureau of pollution control of the department of natural resources as authorized by subsection (h) of Section 49-17-17, Mississippi Code of 1972.

All such loans in aid of construction shall be made subject to the availability of funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-144; Laws, 1971, ch. 456, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 383, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1983).

§ 49-17-65.
Waste disposal plants; construction loans; pledge for repayment; disposition of repaid funds; renegotiation of certain loans.

Any political subdivision desiring to construct a waste disposal plant approved by the Office of Pollution Control of the Department of Environmental Quality, and which receives a loan from the state for that purpose, shall pledge for the repayment of such loan that part of the sales tax reimbursement to which it is entitled under Section 27-65-75 as may be required to meet a repayment schedule adopted by the State Tax Commission. The repayment schedule shall provide for monthly payments, the largest of which shall not exceed the average monthly payment for the term of years of the contract by more than fifteen percent (15%). The repayment schedule shall provide for the repayment of all funds received within not more than twenty (20) years from the date said loan is actually received by the political subdivision; however, the repayment schedule and the time for repayment of all funds received on loans renegotiated under subsection (6) of this section shall be modified by the State Tax Commission to conform with the terms of the renegotiated loan. The State Tax Commission shall withhold monthly from the amount to be remitted to a political subdivision, a sum equal to the next monthly payment.

When bonds shall have been issued by the State of Mississippi to generate funds to be used for loans to be made under the provisions of Section 49-17-61, all payments made in repayment under this section shall be deposited into the Water Pollution Abatement Bond Fund established under the provisions of Section 49-17-61 so long as any such bonds shall be outstanding and unpaid.

When all the bonds shall have been paid, such payments shall be deposited in the Water Pollution Abatement Loan Fund (“loan fund”) established under the provisions of Section 49-17-61.

When no such bonds shall be outstanding and unpaid, the payments shall be deposited in the loan fund.

Funds on deposit in the loan fund may be used to make loans in aid of construction for water pollution abatement upon appropriation by the Legislature.

The Department of Environmental Quality may, on a case-by-case basis, renegotiate the payment of principal on loans made under Sections 49-17-61 through 49-17-70 to political subdivisions located in the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005; however, the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-141; Laws, 1971, ch. 496, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 383, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-67.
Repayment agreement.

Before any political subdivision shall receive any loan it shall have executed with the state tax commission a repayment agreement, a copy of which must also be filed with the bureau of pollution control of the department of natural resources, after which the bureau shall enter upon its minutes a certificate certifying that the waste disposal plant has been approved, a copy of which certificate must be delivered to and filed with the Mississippi State Tax Commission. The repayment schedule hereinabove provided for shall not be construed to prohibit any recipient from prepaying any part or all of the funds received.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-142; Laws, 1971, ch. 496, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 383, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1983).

§ 49-17-68.
Pollution Emergency Fund created; sources of funds.

The Pollution Emergency Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All fines, penalties or other money recovered or collected by the commission under Sections 17-17-29 and 49-17-43 shall be deposited into appropriate accounts in such fund. The commission is further authorized to receive and accept additional funds from any other source to be deposited into the Pollution Emergency Fund. The commission is authorized to utilize any funds in the Pollution Emergency Fund for the purpose of mitigation, abatement, clean-up or other remedial actions and related technical investigations involving the introduction of pollutants, including hazardous wastes, upon or into the land, air or waters of this state and may be used for the purpose of providing the required state matching funds to assist the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency in furtherance of its remedial clean-up program. When the acceptance of such funds by the commission is conditioned on the return of those funds to the grantor after use and recovery, such funds shall be returned to the grantor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1988; Laws, 1991, ch. 396 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 49-17-69.
Repayment of loan by political subdivision ineligible to pledge for repayment under §§ 49-17-65 and 49-17-67; disposition of repaid funds.

Any political subdivision desiring to construct a waste disposal plant approved by the Office of Pollution Control of the Department of Environmental Quality and which receives a loan from the state for that purpose but which is not eligible to pledge for repayment under the provisions of Sections 49-17-65 and 49-17-67, shall repay the loan by making payments each month to the State Treasurer through the Department of Environmental Quality according to the provisions of Section 7-7-15, to be credited to the appropriate fund in lieu of pledging sales tax reimbursements.

The repayment shall be according to a schedule prepared by the State Tax Commission in the same manner as such schedules are prepared for the state’s other political subdivisions. The repayment schedule shall provide for monthly payments, the largest of which shall not exceed the average monthly payment for the term of years of the contract by more than fifteen percent (15%). The repayment schedule shall provide for the repayment of all funds received within no more than twenty (20) years from the date the loan is actually received by the political subdivision; however, the repayment schedule and the time for repayment of all funds received on loans renegotiated under Section 49-17-61(6) shall be modified by the State Tax Commission to conform with the terms of the renegotiated loan. The political subdivision shall remit its monthly payment by the twentieth of the month to the Department of Environmental Quality and the payments shall be made prior to the payments of principal or interest on any bonds issued by the political subdivision in connection with the project or projects to which the pollution abatement loans are made.

The State Auditor shall annually audit the receipts and expenditures of each district whose monthly payments are to be received by him, and if he should find such political subdivision in arrears for two (2) consecutive years, he shall immediately begin withholding from funds due the taxing district in which the political subdivision is located, under the provisions of Section 27-33-41(g) and (h), an amount equal to twelve (12) times the largest monthly payment due and issue his warrant for such amount to either one (1) of the two (2) special funds as directed below.

The repayment schedule provided for in this section shall not be construed to prohibit any recipient from prepaying any part or all of the funds received.

When bonds shall have been issued by the State of Mississippi to generate funds to be used for loans to be made under the provisions of Section 49-17-61, all payments made in repayment under this section shall be deposited into the Water Pollution Abatement Bond Fund established under the provisions of Section 49-17-61 so long as any such bonds shall be outstanding and unpaid.

When all such bonds shall have been paid, the payments shall be deposited in the Water Pollution Abatement Loan Fund (“loan fund”) established under the provisions of Section 49-17-61.

When no such bonds shall be outstanding and unpaid, the payments shall be deposited in the loan fund.

Funds on deposit in the loan fund may be used to make loans in aid of construction for water pollution abatement upon appropriation by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7106-151.3, 7106-151.5; Laws, 1972, ch. 403, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 383, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 311, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 418, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-70.
Repayment agreement; certificate of approved disposal plant.

Before any political subdivision shall receive any loan, it shall have executed with the state tax commission a repayment agreement, a copy of which must also be filed with the bureau of pollution control of the department of natural resources, after which the bureau shall enter upon its minutes a certificate certifying that the waste disposal plant has been approved; a copy of which certificate shall be delivered to and filed with the Mississippi State Tax Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7106-151.5; Laws, 1972, ch. 403, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 383, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1983).